Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 25 Size, Weight, and Load Limits
31-25-27.
Weight restrictions.

State highways. The state traffic commission shall likewise have authority, as granted to local authorities in this chapter, to determine by resolution and to impose restrictions as to the weight of vehicles operated upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the commission, and the restrictions shall be effective when signs giving notice of them are erected upon the highway or portion of any highway affected by the resolution.

Penalties for posted bridge weight violations shall be based on the fine schedule imposed within the provisions of §

31-25-16

.

Bridges. The department of transportation, through the state traffic commission, shall have the authority with respect to any state, local, or privately-owned bridge, excluding those owned or controlled by the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, to impose a weight restriction or close a bridge, based on deficiencies documented in a bridge inspection or load rating for the purpose of public safety. Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall have the authority for bridges owned or controlled by Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority to impose a weight restriction or close a bridge, based on deficiencies documented in a bridge inspection or load rating for the purpose of public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-27

; P.L. 1986, ch. 282, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 367, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 368, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

31-25-27.1.
Weight restrictions on the Veterans Memorial Parkway — East Providence.

No motor vehicle with a gross weight exceeding two (2) tons except those listed in this section shall be allowed to travel the Veterans Memorial Parkway in the city of East Providence.

The director of the department of revenue is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section: vehicles of a fire department, police vehicles, corrections vehicles, ambulances, emergency vehicles, state vehicles, municipal vehicles, vehicles of the Rhode Island public transit authority, marked school administration vehicles, and delivery vehicles whose destination is addressed on the parkway.

The department of revenue or local authority is authorized in accordance with the provisions of §

31-25-23

to issue or withhold permits to all vehicles other than those enumerated in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 484, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 22.

31-25-27.2.
Weight restrictions on Route 114 — Bristol.

No commercial motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to travel on Route 114 (Hope Street and Ferry Road) between Gooding Avenue and Route 136.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section: any commercial vehicle whose destination is anywhere, either on or off the routes stated in subsection (a) of this section; any and all emergency vehicles, state vehicles, municipal vehicles, public transit vehicles, marked school administration vehicles, and vehicles participating in the annual 4th of July parade or other civic parades.

Any commercial registered motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, shall be prohibited from traveling the routes stated in subsection (a) as a through route. Signs will be posted by the department of transportation stating “Local Deliveries Only — No Through Trucking — 4 Ton Weight Limit.”

Violations of this section shall be a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 381, § 1.

31-25-27.3.
Weight restrictions on Route 114 — Johnston.

No commercial motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to travel on Hopkins Avenue.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section: any commercial vehicle whose destination is anywhere, either on or off the routes stated in subsection (a) of this section; any and all emergency vehicles, state vehicles, municipal vehicles, public transit vehicles, and marked school transportation vehicles.

Any commercial registered motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, shall be prohibited from traveling the routes stated in subsection (a) as a through route. Signs will be posted by the department of transportation stating “Local Deliveries Only — No Through Trucking — 4 Ton Weight Limit.”

Violations of this section shall be a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 533, § 1.

31-25-27.4.
Weight restrictions on South Main Street — Coventry.

No commercial motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to travel on South Main Street.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section: any commercial vehicle whose destination is anywhere, either on or off the routes stated in subsection (a) of this section; any and all emergency vehicles, state vehicles, municipal vehicles, public transit vehicles, and marked school administration vehicles.

Any commercial registered motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, shall be prohibited from traveling the routes stated in subsection (a) as a through route. Signs will be posted by the department of transportation stating “Local Deliveries Only — No Through Trucking — 4 Ton Weight Limit.”

Violations of this section shall be a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 305, § 1.

31-25-27.5.
Weight restrictions on state roadways — East Providence.

No commercial motor vehicle with a gross weight exceeding five (5) tons, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to park on any state roadway in the city of East Providence in excess of two (2) hours.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit parking of commercial vehicles as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

Any and all emergency vehicles, state vehicles, municipal vehicles, public transit vehicles, any construction vehicles performing work on said roadways, and marked school transportation vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 213, § 1.

31-25-27.6.
Weight restrictions on Route 15 — Armistice Boulevard — Pawtucket.

No commercial motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to travel on Route 15 (Armistice Boulevard from Newport Avenue easterly to the Rhode Island state line).

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section: any commercial vehicle whose designation is anywhere, either on or off the roads stated in subsection (a) of this section, any and all emergency vehicles, state vehicles, marked school administration vehicles and delivery vehicles whose destination is addressed on the parkway.

Any commercial registered motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, shall be prohibited from traveling the routes stated in subsection (a) as a through route. Signs will be posted by the department of transportation stating “Local Deliveries Only — No Through Trucking — Four (4) Ton Weight Limit.”

Violations of this section shall be a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 314, § 1.

31-25-27.7.
Weight restrictions on route 114 — Warren.

No commercial motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to travel on route 114 in the town of Warren.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this section: any commercial vehicle whose destination is anywhere, either on or off the routes stated in subsection (a) of this section; any and all emergency vehicles, state vehicles, municipal vehicles, public transit vehicles, marked school administration vehicles, and vehicles participating in the annual 4th of July parade or other civic parades.

Any commercial registered motor truck or tractor with a gross weight exceeding four (4) tons, shall be prohibited from traveling the routes stated in subsection (a), provided, however, commercial registered motor trucks, tractors, and equipment exceeding four (4) tons, including tractor trailer trucks, shall be allowed to travel north of Child Street (Route 103) on Main Street to get to and from Barrington. Signs will be posted by the department of transportation stating “Local Deliveries Only — No Through Trucking — 4 Ton Weight Limit.”

Violations of this section shall be a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 416, § 1.

31-25-27.8.
Weight restrictions within North Smithfield town hall area.

No commercial motor truck or tractor with more than four (4) axles, except those listed in this section, shall be allowed to travel on Main Street, North Main Street, School Street, and Green Street, within .3 miles of the North Smithfield town hall in the town of North Smithfield. Such vehicles shall also be prohibited from crossing the historic stone arch bridge in the area of Railroad Street and Providence Pike (Route 5) in North Smithfield while construction and repair on such bridge is being undertaken.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section. Signs will be posted by the department of transportation stating “Local Deliveries Only — No Through Trucking — 4 Axle Limit.”

The following vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of the travel restrictions set forth in this section, except as to the prohibition against crossing the historic stone arch bridge: any commercial vehicle whose destination is anywhere either on or off the routes stated in subsection (a) of this section; any and all emergency vehicles, state, municipal vehicles, public transit vehicles, marked school administration vehicles; and vehicles participating in a civic parade. As to the historic stone arch bridge, only emergency vehicles, public transit vehicles, and marked school administration vehicles shall be exempt from the prohibition against crossing said bridge while construction and repair on said bridge is being undertaken.

Violations of this section shall be a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 120, § 1.

31-25-27.9.
Weight restrictions on Smith Avenue in Smithfield.

No tractor or truck tractor, as defined in 23 C.F.R. 658.5, pulling a trailer or trailers, shall be allowed to travel on that portion of Route 116 between Route 44 and West Greenville Road known as Smith Avenue in the town of Smithfield.

The director of the department of transportation is directed to post signs to limit access as prescribed in subsection (a).

Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense, and not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 514, § 1.

31-25-27.10.
Weight restrictions on Forest Avenue and Turner Road — Middletown.

The operation of through commercial vehicles on Forest Avenue and Turner Road is prohibited.

For purposes of this section, a commercial vehicle is defined as a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles used to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

Has a gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds (26,001 lbs.) or more, or a towed unit with a gross vehicle rating of more than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or more, or has a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds (26,001 lbs.) or more; or

Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers including the driver; or

Is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F, as it may be revised from time to time.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the use of such streets or highways by:

Any fire truck, town public works department truck, police vehicle, ambulance, school bus, bus serving the area, or other motor truck using such streets or highways in any emergency or engaged in delivering goods, wares, merchandising or materials to or from any residence, building or lot within the town bordering on such streets or highways; or

Any farm vehicle as defined in §

31-1-8

, which is registered with farm plates pursuant to §

31-3-31

.

In all instances where motor vehicle traffic is restricted or prohibited under this section, the town administrator is directed to cause signs to be erected on such streets or highways giving notice of such, in accordance with the manual on uniform traffic control devices.

Any driver who operates a commercial vehicle in contravention of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for a first violation, fifty dollars ($50.00) for a second violation, and not less than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), but no more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 192, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 193, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

31-25-27.11.
Weight restrictions on Limerock Road — Smithfield and Lincoln.

The operation of through commercial vehicles on Limerock Road between Douglas Pike in Smithfield and Jenckes Hill Road in Lincoln is prohibited.

For purposes of this section, a commercial vehicle is defined as a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles used to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

Has a gross combination weight rating of thirty-five thousand one pounds (35,001 lbs.) or more, or a towed unit with a gross vehicle rating of more than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or more, or has a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds (26,001 lbs.) or more; or

Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers including the driver; or

Is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F, as it may be revised from time to time.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the use of such street or roadway by:

Any fire truck, town public works department truck, state department of transportation truck, police vehicle, ambulance, school bus, bus serving the area, or other motor truck using such streets or highways in any emergency or engaged in delivering goods, wares, merchandising, or materials to or from any residence, building, or lot within the towns bordering on such streets or highways; or

Any farm vehicle as defined in §

31-1-8

, which is registered with farm plates pursuant to §

31-3-31

.

Any driver who operates a commercial vehicle in contravention of this section shall be subject to a fine of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) for a first violation and one hundred ten dollars ($110) for each subsequent violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 55, § 1.

31-25-27.12.
Commercial vehicles prohibited on Chases Lane in Middletown.

The operation of commercial vehicles is prohibited on Chases Lane in Middletown.

For purposes of this section, a “commercial vehicle” is defined as a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles used to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

Has a gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds (26,001 lbs.) or more, or a towed unit with a gross vehicle rating of more than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or more, or has a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds (26,001 lbs.) or more; or

Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers including the driver; or

Is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F, as it may be revised from time to time.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the use of Chases Lane by:

Any fire truck, town public works department truck, police vehicle, ambulance, school bus, bus serving the area, or other motor truck using such streets or highways in any emergency or engaged in delivering public utilities, goods, wares, merchandising, or materials to or from any residence, residential building, or residential lot within the town bordering on such street; provided further, that the use of Chases Lane for the delivery of goods, wares, merchandising, or materials to or from any commercial business or building, or any commercial lot within the town bordering on such street is specifically prohibited; or

Any farm vehicle as defined in §

31-1-8

, which is registered with farm vehicle plates pursuant to §

31-3-31

.

In all instances where motor vehicle traffic is restricted or prohibited under this section, the town administrator is directed to cause signs to be erected on such streets or highways giving notice of such, in accordance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

Any driver who operates a commercial vehicle in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for a first violation, fifty dollars ($50.00) for a second violation, and not less than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), but no more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 19, § 1, effective May 11, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 21, § 1, effective May 11, 2022.

31-25-28.
Liability for damages from oversize or overweight.

Any person driving any vehicle, object, or contrivance upon any highway or highway structure shall be liable for all damage which the highway or structure may sustain as a result of any illegal operation, driving, or moving of the vehicle, object, or contrivance, or as a result of operating, driving, or moving any vehicle, object, or contrivance weighing in excess of the maximum weight, or over the maximum dimensions in this chapter but authorized by a special permit issued as provided in this chapter.

Whenever the driver is not the owner of a vehicle, object, or contrivance, but is so operating, driving, or moving it with the express or implied permission of the owner, then the owner and driver shall be jointly and severally liable for the damage.

Damage may be recovered in a civil action brought by the authorities in control of the highway or highway structure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 35, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-25-28

; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-29.
Refuse-hauling vehicles — Exemption from permit.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of this chapter, a motor vehicle designed and used for the hauling of refuse shall not be subject to state axle weight restrictions when hauling refuse. Nothing in this provision shall waive or modify existing state gross weight restrictions for refuse vehicles or other size and weight restrictions. To the extent that application of this section to highways which are part of the national system of interstate and defense highways would cause this state to be deprived of any federal funds for highway purposes, this section shall not be applicable to highways which are part of the system. Nothing in this section shall permit these vehicles to travel over any structure, highway, or portion of highway that is weight restricted for the vehicle load.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

31-25-30.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 310, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 122, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 310, § 2, effective June 12, 2011, and shall be repealed two (2) years subsequent to such date or upon the closure of the existing structures.